Harmony.lexc
!Practice with Xinkan suffix harmony and glottalization
!All working not the completive deglottalization. 

Multichar_Symbols
%{F%}
%-lh
%.incomp
%.comp
%'
ch
ts'
-1sg.comp
-pl
%-
l'
%{Q%}

LEXICON Root
    Nouns ;
    Verbs ;

LEXICON Nouns
mak'u Num ;
seema Num ;
pɨk'ɨ Num ;
pene Num ;

LEXICON Verbs
niw'a Asp ;
hooro Asp ;
uchi Asp ;
upa Asp ;
uwa Asp ;
uʃa Asp ;
ipla Asp ;
etka Asp ;
paɬta Asp ;
p'uhru Asp ;
k'eɬke Asp ;
hurpi Asp ;
hawka Asp ;
apla Asp ;
ʃawʃa Asp ;
ormo Asp ;

LEXICON Num
-pl:%-lh%{F%} # ;
-sg:0 # ;

LEXICON Asp
.incomp:0 # ;
.comp:0 Agr ;

LEXICON Agr
-1sg.comp:-n' #;
